Utah statutes.
70A-8-406.   Obligation to notify issuer of lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken security certificate.

(1)  If a security certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed, or wrongfully taken, and the owner fails to notify the issuer of that fact within the reasonable time after the owner has notice of it and the issuer registers a transfer of the security before receiving notification, the owner may not assert against the issuer a claim for registering the transfer under Section 70A-8-404 or a claim to a new security certificate under Section 70A-8-405.

(2)  On and after July 1, 2011, Subsection (1) does not apply to the replacement of a lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken share certificate of a water company.  Section 70A-8-409.1 governs replacement of a lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken share certificate of a water company.

(3)  On and after May 8, 2012, Subsection (1) does not apply to the replacement of a lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken share certificate of a land company.  Section 70A-8-409.1 governs the replacement of a lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken share certificate of a land company.



Amended by Chapter 386, 2012 General Session

